Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 6. Marking of Boats, Nets and Other Devices

§ 28.2-233.
License tags or identification generally.

The Commission shall provide metal license tags or identification numbers to licensees in a form and manner prescribed by the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-76; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-73, 28.1-74; 1966, c. 684; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to fishing in Pocomoke Sound and Tangier Sound, see §

28.2-524

.

As to fishing in Chesapeake Bay immediately west of Tangier Island, see §

28.2-525

.

§ 28.2-234.
License tags and identification numbers to be fastened; penalty.

License tags or identification numbers shall be attached and displayed in the following manner:

License tags for fixed fishery devices, including pound nets, fyke nets, crab traps, and staked gill nets, shall be fastened to one of the offshore stakes.

License tags for anchored gill nets and drift gill nets shall be fastened to a flagstaff or a buoy that is visible from the surface.

License tags for vessels using haul seines, purse nets, trawl nets, crab pots, trotlines, and crab scrapes shall be fastened at a conspicuous place on the starboard side or the mast of the vessel.

License tags issued for businesses purchasing seafood shall be affixed in a conspicuous place on the business establishment, boat or motor vehicle.

Identification numbers when issued for particular devices shall be applied by the license holder and shall be in place at all times when the gear is deployed.

Any such licensee who fails to properly attach or display such a license tag or identification number is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-43, 28-77, 28-78, 28-175; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-48, 28.1-74, 28.1-76, 28.1-171; 1966, c. 684; 1968, cc. 748, 750, § 28.1-173.2; 1970, c. 726, § 28.1-119.1; 1972, c. 833; 1973, c. 21; 1976, c. 392; 1979, c. 274; 1980, c. 218; 1981, c. 61; 1983, c. 307; 1984, c. 316; 1988, c. 27; 1990, c. 445; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-235.
Duty to apply for new tag in case of loss; penalty.

Should the metal tag required by §

28.2-234

be removed or destroyed by accident, by the force of the sea, or in any other casual manner, the licensee shall apply for a new tag within twenty-four hours after the discovery of the destruction or loss of the original tag.
Failure to do so is a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-79; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-77; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-236.
Seizure of unmarked devices.

Any fishing device not marked, tagged or identified in the required manner may be seized by an officer and held for any forthcoming legal proceeding.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-77; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-74; 1964, c. 393; 1966, c. 684; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-237.
Removal of abandoned pole or stake; revocation of licenses for failure to remove stakes.

Any person fishing a pound net or any other type of fishing device requiring the use of fixed poles or stakes shall remove all such abandoned poles or stakes; however, one pole or stake may be left standing at least four feet above mean high water at old stands as an identification marker.Abandoned poles or stakes are considered to be poles or stakes which are not used for fishing.

The Commission may revoke any fishing licenses issued to such person, as set forth in §

28.2-232

, if abandoned poles or stakes are not promptly removed. Failure to remove such poles or stakes is a Class 1 misdemeanor. The most recent licensee for the fishing device is responsible for removing the poles or stakes.

History.

1962, c. 406, § 28.1-79; 1964, c. 393; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-238.
Concealing name or number of vessel; penalty.

Any captain or owner who covers or conceals the name, registration number, or fishing license tag of any boat licensed and engaged in the fisheries under this subtitle is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-49, 28-214; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-54, 28.1-190; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-239.
Exemptions from article.

Nothing in this article applies to boats used purely for recreation, or for taking fish or shellfish by rod and line or with hand lines, for family use only.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-80; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-78; 1992, c. 836.